Hawaii statutes.
[§166E-1] Legislative findings. The
legislature finds that article XI, section 10, of the state constitution establishes
that "the public lands shall be used for the development of farm and
homeownership on as widespread a basis as possible, in accordance with
procedures and limitations prescribed by law".

Therefore, the legislature finds that certain
public lands classified for agricultural use by the department of land and
natural resources should be transferred to the department of agriculture, with the
approval of the board of land and natural resources and the board of
agriculture, for purposes and in a manner consistent with article XI, section
10, of the state constitution.

The purpose of this chapter is to ensure the
long-term productive use of public lands leased or available to be leased by
the department of land and natural resources for agricultural purposes by
allowing these lands to be transferred to and managed by the department of
agriculture. [L 2003, c 90, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next